North Dakota, session 69, SB2171.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 25-03.1-26 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
25-03.1-26. Emergency procedure - Acceptance of petition and individual - Notice - Court
hearing set.
1. A public treatment facility immediately shall accept and a private treatment facility may accept
on a provisional basis the application and the individual admitted under section 25-03.1-25.
The superintendent or director shall require an immediate examination of the subject and,.
2. either within twenty-four hours, exclusive of holidays, after admission or within Within
seventy-two hours after admission, exclusive of holidays, if the individual is admitted with a
serious physical condition or illness that requires prompt treatment as medically necessary,
the superintendent or director shall either:
a. Release the individual if the superintendent or director finds that the subject does not
meet the emergency commitment standards; or
b. File a petition if one has not been filed with the court of the individual's residence or the
court which directed immediate custody under subsection 2 of section 25-03.1-25, giving
notice to the court and stating in detail the circumstances and facts of the case.
2.3. Upon receipt of the petition and notice of the emergency detention, the magistrate shall set a
date for a preliminary hearing, if the respondent is alleged to be a personan individual who is
mentally ill or a personan individual who is both mentally ill and has a substance use disorder,
or a treatment hearing, if the respondent is alleged to be a personan individual who has a
substance use disorder, to be held no later than four days, exclusive of weekends and
holidays, after detention unless the personindividual has been released as a personan
individual not requiring treatment, has been voluntarily admitted for treatment, has requested
or agreed to a continuance, or unless the hearing has been extended by the magistrate for
good cause shown. The magistrate shall appoint counsel if one has not been retained by the
respondent.
SECTION 2. EMERGENCY. This Act is declared to be an emergency measure.

S. B. NO. 2171 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2171 and that two-thirds of the
members-elect of the Senate voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 0 Absent 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that two-thirds of the members-elect of the House of Representatives voted in favor of
said law.
Vote: Yeas 87 Nays 5 Absent 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State